Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2963.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CULTURAL UPGRADES AT BATTLE CREEK RECREATION CENTER.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to Ramsey County to improve fields at Battle Creek Recreation Center to accommodate cultural diversity. new text end